Indiana, session 2026, HB1402.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-46-1-11.4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.107-2024,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.4. (a) Subsection (b) does not apply to a
tobacco and vaping business:
(1) operating as a tobacco and vaping business before July 1,
2020; 2026; or
(2) that began operating as a tobacco and vaping business after
June 30, 2020, and before July 1, 2024, 2026, if at the time the
tobacco and vaping business began operating the tobacco and
vaping business was not located in an area prohibited under this
section.
(b) A person may not operate a tobacco and vaping business within
one thousand (1,000) three thousand five hundred twenty (3,520)
feet of a public or private elementary or secondary school, as measured
between the nearest point of the premises occupied by the tobacco and
vaping business and the nearest point of a building used by the school
for instructional purposes.
2026 IN 1402—LS 6509/DI 143


(c) Subsection (d) does not apply to a tobacco and vaping business:
(1) operating as a tobacco and vaping business before July 1,
2024; 2026; or
(2) that began operating as a tobacco and vaping business after
June 30, 2024, 2026, if at the time the tobacco and vaping
business began operating the tobacco and vaping business was not
located in an area prohibited under this section.
(d) A person may not operate a tobacco and vaping business within
one thousand (1,000) three thousand five hundred twenty (3,520)
feet of school property, measured from the nearest point of the
premises occupied by the tobacco and vaping business.
(e) A person who violates this section commits a Class C
misdemeanor.
2026 IN 1402—LS 6509/DI 143